Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government,
charter county government, unified local government, consolidated local
government, or planning unit that is engaged in planning and zoning under
this chapter;
(b) "Owner" means a person that has an interest in title or a present possessory
interest in property that is offered to the public as a short-term rental, and
includes a tenant that has received permission from his or her landlord to
offer the rented property as a short-term rental; and
(c) "Short-term rental" means the rental of a dwelling unit or part of a
dwelling unit, other living or sleeping space, an accessory dwelling unit, or
any other space made available for rent for terms of less than thirty (30)
consecutive days at a time.
(2) A local government shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation that:
(a) Requires a conditional use permit or other similar permit to be obtained to
use a property as a short-term rental;
(b) Imposes density-based restrictions on short-term rentals, including any
requirement that short-term rentals:
1. Be spaced any distance apart from other short-term rentals; or
2. May not exceed a specified percentage or number of housing units in
a given building, zoning district, or other geographical boundary;
(c) Prohibits the operation of a short-term rental in a residential zone;
(d) Regulates the time, including the duration, frequency, or time of year, that a
Page 1 of 5
BR138900.100 - 1389 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1389
property is used as a short-term rental;
(e) Limits the number of properties used as short-term rentals by any person or
entity;
(f) Imposes a residency requirement of any kind to operate a short-term rental,
including a requirement that:
1. A person be present when a property is used as a short-term rental;
2. The property serves as a primary residence of the short-term rental
operator; or
3. The operator of the short-term rental be present or reside in the
primary residence on the property if an accessory dwelling unit is used
as a short-term rental;
(g) Restricts or imposes requirements on any short-term rental platform or the
use of a short-term rental platform for the listing of short-term rentals; or
(h) Prohibits or restricts a tenant from offering a leased property as a short-
term rental, so long as the tenant has received permission to do so from his
or her landlord.
(3) (a) Subject to the preemptions set out in subsection (2) of this section, a local
government may require an owner to obtain a permit for each property used
as a short-term rental by adopting an ordinance containing the
requirements set out in this subsection.
(b) A local government that requires permits shall require only one (1) permit
for each single family home, two (2) family or multifamily dwelling,
condominium, cooperative, or timeshare that an owner uses as a short-term
rental. A permit shall cover all dwelling units and detached accessory
structures located on the permitted property.
(c) An owner shall submit a permit application for each property for which a
permit is sought. The permit application shall require the owner to provide
Page 2 of 5
BR138900.100 - 1389 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1389
only the following information for each property:
1. a. If the owner is an individual, the owner's name, mailing address,
email address, and telephone number;
b. If the owner is a corporation or partnership:
i. The owner's state of incorporation or organization; and
ii. Names, business addresses, and telephone numbers of the
owner's principal officers or partners; and
c. If a property manager is used, in addition to the information in
subdivisions a. and b. of this subparagraph, the property
manager's name, mailing address, email address, and telephone
number; and
2. A short description of how each of the owner's short-term rentals on
the property are marketed or advertised, including the following:
a. The advertised occupancy limits of each short-term rental; and
b. Whether the short-term rental is a:
i. Single family home;
ii. Dwelling unit in a single family home;
iii. Dwelling unit in a two (2) family or multifamily dwelling;
or
iv. Dwelling unit in a condominium, cooperative, or
timeshare.
(d) A permit application shall be made by an owner. If the owner is a
corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, the permit application shall
be made by an officer or agent of the owner.
(e) If an owner submits a permit application under this subsection that meets
the requirements set forth in the ordinance adopted by the local
government, the unit shall issue a permit to the owner within thirty (30)
Page 3 of 5
BR138900.100 - 1389 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1389
days of receipt of the application.
(f) If any information provided by an owner to a local government in the
permit application changes, the owner shall provide the updated
information to the local government in writing within thirty (30) business
days of the change.
(g) Permits issued under this subsection shall be valid for one (1) year from the
date of issuance.
(h) A local government unit may charge a permit fee, not to exceed one
hundred fifty dollars ($150), for:
1. An initial permit issued to an owner for the permitted property; and
2. A subsequent permit to an owner for the permitted property after the
owner's previous permit was revoked pursuant to paragraph (j) of this
subsection.
(i) A local government shall not charge a permit fee for the renewal of a
permit, including the renewal of a permit that has expired.
(j) If three (3) or more citations for ordinance violations are issued to an owner
for a permitted property within a calendar year, the local government may
revoke the permit for that permitted property for a period of not more than
one (1) year after the date the permit is revoked. The local government shall
provide notice and a hearing for revocation in accordance with the
procedures for revocation of other permits issued by the local government.
(k) An application for a permit shall not be approved following a revocation
until any outstanding fines are paid for the ordinance violation citations
issued to the owner.
(l) If an owner sells all or part of a permitted property, the permit shall not be
transferred to the new owner. The new owner may apply for a new permit
pursuant to this subsection.
Page 4 of 5
BR138900.100 - 1389 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1389
(4) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a local government from adopting
or enforcing ordinances or regulations that are applicable to all dwellings and
are necessary for public health or safety, provided that those ordinances or
regulations do not treat short-term rentals differently from other residential uses
of property.
(5) This section shall supersede and render void and unenforceable any local
ordinance or regulation to the contrary. The permitting system set out in
subsection (3) of this section shall be the exclusive means by which a local
government may issue permits in relation to the use of property as a short-term
rental. If a local government is found by a court to have violated any provision of
this section, the court may award attorney's fees and costs to a party aggrieved by
the action of the local government.
(6) This section shall not be construed to affect, prohibit, preempt, or render
unenforceable any property or use restrictions contained in the properly enacted
rules or regulations of a homeowners association, condominium association, or
other similar property owner association or cooperative.
Page 5 of 5
BR138900.100 - 1389 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed